Utah statutes.
4-37-105.   Responsibilities of Wildlife Board and Division of Wildlife Resources.

(1)  The Wildlife Board and Division of Wildlife Resources are responsible for  determining the species of aquatic animals which may be imported into, possessed, and transported within the state.

(2)  Subject to the policies and rules of the Fish Health Policy Board, the Wildlife Board and the Division of Wildlife Resources shall:

(a)  act to prevent the outbreak and act to control the spread of disease-causing pathogens among aquatic animals in public aquaculture facilities; and

(b)  act to prevent the spread of disease-causing pathogens from aquatic animals in, to be deposited in, or harvested from public aquaculture facilities and private ponds to aquatic wildlife, other animals, and humans.

